District of Columbia statutes.
48-851.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Health care facility” means a hospital, assisted living facility, nursing home, or institutional pharmacy.

(2)

“Institutional pharmacy” means that physical portion of a health care facility where drugs, devices, and other materials used in the diagnosis or treatment of injury, illness, and disease are dispensed, compounded, or distributed and pharmaceutical care is provided.

(3)

“Pharmaceutical product” means a drug or biologic for human use regulated by the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(4)

“Retail pharmacy” means a pharmacy that provides services to the public on an outpatient basis.

Mar. 5, 2010, D.C. Law 18-112, § 2, 56 DCR 9378

History

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to the Unused Pharmaceutical Safe Disposal Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2011-90, May 6, 2011 ( 58 DCR 4176).

Delegation of Authority